North Carolina, session 2025, HB889.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources (Department) shall,
no later than March 1, 2026, negotiate a Memorandum of Agreement (MOA) for the Department
to (i) assume the management and operation of the River Walk, adjacent Park, and any associated
parking areas (collectively, the Facilities) in the Town of Fair Bluff (Town) as a unit of Lumber
River State Park (Park) and (ii) utilize the Town's Lumber River Visitors Center (Center) as the
Headquarters of the Park. The MOA shall include, at a minimum, the following:
(1) Delineation of the areas subject to the respective management of the Town
and the Department. The MOA may provide for shared management of
parking and other areas utilized for the River Walk, the Park, and the Center
and for other uses.
(2) The establishment, collection, and sharing of any user fees for property usage
and events operated at the Facilities and the Center. Nothing in this
subdivision is intended to (i) require the charging of admission to any property
or event or (ii) authorize the Department to charge an admission fee for use of
the Facilities or the Center other than during a festival or other special event
or as a rental fee for a private event.
(3) The adoption and enforcement of bylaws, rules, and guidelines needed for the
Department to carry out the management duties imposed by the MOA.
(4) The transfer or agreement on shared use, management, or implementation of
any assets, liabilities, contracts, or agreements between the Town and the
Department necessary to carry out the duties imposed on the Department and
Town by the MOA. Any delegation or transfer shall be made in accordance
with applicable law.
SECTION 2. The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall enter into the
Memorandum of Agreement required by Section 1 of this act no later than March 1, 2026, and
shall submit a copy of the Memorandum of Agreement to the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on Governmental Operations and the Fiscal Research Division prior to the convening
of the 2026 Regular Session of the 2025 General Assembly.
*H889-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 889-First Edition